Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

23-31-101. University established - role and mission.

There is hereby established a university at Fort Collins to be known as Colorado state university. Colorado state university shall be a comprehensive graduate research university with selective admission standards offering a comprehensive array of baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degree programs. Consistent with the tradition of land grant universities, Colorado state university has exclusive authority to offer graduate and undergraduate programs in agriculture, forestry, natural resources, and veterinary medicine. The Colorado commission on higher education, in consultation with the board of governors of the Colorado state university system, shall designate those graduate level programs that are the primary responsibility of Colorado state university. Colorado state university has the responsibility to provide on a statewide basis, utilizing when possible and appropriate the faculty and facilities of other educational institutions, those graduate level programs. The commission shall include in its funding recommendations a level of general fund support for these programs.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 524, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-101 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-102. Name changed.

The agricultural college at Fort Collins, declared to be an institution of the state by section 5 of article VIII of the state constitution as said section existed prior to January 11, 1973, and designated under the name and title of the "Colorado agricultural and mechanical college" by section 124-10-1, CRS 53, after May 1, 1957, shall be designated under the name and title of the "Colorado state university". The legal effect of any statute prior to May 1, 1957, designating such institution by any other name, or property rights acquired and obligations incurred prior to May 1, 1957, under any other name, shall not be impaired hereby.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 524, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-102 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-103. Board to control college and lands.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the general control and supervision of the Colorado state university and lands and the use thereof, which may be vested in the university by state or national legislation and of all appropriations made by the state for the support of the same. The board has plenary power to adopt all such ordinances, bylaws, and regulations, not in conflict with the law, as they may deem necessary to secure the successful operation of the university and promote the designed objects.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 525, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-108 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-104. Who shall constitute faculty.

The president and the faculty shall constitute the faculty of the Colorado state university.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 525, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-113 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-104 was relocated to § 23-30-109.

23-31-105. Duty of faculty.

The faculty shall have the responsibility for making academic policy and governing the academic affairs of the Colorado state university.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 525, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-115 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-105 was relocated to § 23-30-110.

23-31-106. President - duties.

The president shall be chief executive officer of the Colorado state university, and it is his or her duty to see that the rules and regulations of the board of governors of the Colorado state university system and the faculty are observed and executed.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 525, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-117 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-106 was relocated to § 23-30-111.

23-31-107. President may remove officers.

The subordinate officers and employees, not members of the faculty, shall be under the direction of the president and removable at his or her discretion. The president may fill vacancies of such subordinate officers and employees subject to his or her personnel power.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 525, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-118 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-107 was relocated to § 23-30-112.

23-31-108. President may be professor.

The president may or may not perform the duties of a professor, as the board of governors of the Colorado state university system shall determine.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 525, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-119 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-108 was relocated to § 23-31-103.

23-31-109. Report of experimental operations.

All agricultural operations shall be carried on experimentally for the instruction of the students and with a view to the improvement of the science of agriculture in the state of Colorado. Such reports as may be required by the board of governors of the Colorado state university system shall be submitted in accordance with the directions of the board.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 525, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-121 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-109 was relocated to § 23-30-116.

23-31-110. Pledge of income from facilities or equipment.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system, designated in this section as the "board", is authorized to enter into a contract for the advancement of moneys for the acquisition of facilities or equipment, or both, for the Colorado state university auditorium-gymnasium, and in connection with or as a part of such contract to pledge the net income, or any part of such net income, to be derived from such facilities or equipment, or both, so acquired, and to pledge special student fees assessed for the purpose of financing such facilities or equipment, or both, as security for the repayment of the moneys advanced therefor, together with interest thereon. For the same purpose, the board is also authorized to pledge the net income derived from any similar facility or equipment, or portion thereof, which was not acquired with moneys appropriated to Colorado state university, if such net income derived from such similar facility or equipment, or portion thereof, is unpledged or, if pledged, is currently in excess of the amount required to amortize the advancements and interest thereon for which such net income has been obligated.

The board shall not pledge the general income of Colorado state university or create any mortgage upon property belonging to such institution or obligate the state of Colorado for the purpose of repaying or receiving any funds raised or advanced under the provisions of this section.

Any advancement of moneys may be evidenced by revenue bonds or warrants to be executed by and on behalf of Colorado state university and containing such terms and provisions, including provisions for redemption prior to maturity and a maximum net effective interest rate, as may be determined by the board. Such revenue bonds or warrants shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate fixed, which interest shall be payable semiannually or annually. Such revenue bonds or warrants may be sold at less than par, but they may not be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds or warrants exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate fixed. Any such revenue bonds or warrants may be refunded if in the judgment of the board such refunding is to the best interests of the university.

If the net income derived from such facilities or equipment so acquired under the provisions of this section exceeds the amount required for the amortization of any advancement made therefor, together with interest thereon, the board may apply such surplus to the redemption of such securities prior to maturity of such securities according to redemption provisions thereof, or such surplus net income may be used by the board for the purposes of altering or adding to any existing equipment or facilities acquired pursuant to the provisions of this section.

All obligations and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 526, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-127 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-111. Rents or charges for buildings and facilities for research.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system is authorized to contract for or impose and collect rents or charges for the use of university buildings and facilities for research, including research conducted by or under the auspices of Colorado state university. Such rents or charges shall be at a level reasonably calculated to return or amortize the cost of such buildings and facilities within a reasonable period not exceeding the life of such buildings and facilities; but such user charges or rents may not be imposed and collected in such a manner as to require payment directly or indirectly from the state general fund, tuition receipts, or student fees.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 526, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-128 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-111 was relocated to § 23-30-118.

23-31-112. Research building revolving fund - appropriation of fund.

There is established in the office of the state treasurer a fund to be known as the Colorado state university research building revolving fund, and there shall be credited to said fund the user charges or rents authorized by section 23-31-111 and imposed by the board of governors of the Colorado state university system, specific appropriations or grants or gifts made to said fund, the proceeds of the sale of anticipation warrants authorized by this section and sections 23-31-111 and 23-31-113, and the proceeds from the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to section 23-31-117. No payments from student fees, tuition receipts, or general funds shall be deposited in the research building revolving fund. All interest earned on the investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and shall be a part of the fund, and such moneys shall not be transferred or credited to the general fund or to any other fund. All such moneys so credited to said fund are appropriated to Colorado state university for the payment of maintenance and operating costs for its research buildings and facilities and for planning, constructing, acquiring, renovating, and equipping research buildings and facilities, wherever located in the state of Colorado, for Colorado state university. Any such buildings and facilities shall be related to the research mission of the university.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 527, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-129 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-112 was relocated to § 23-30-119.

23-31-113. Anticipation warrants.

The state treasurer is authorized to issue anticipation warrants in such amounts as requested by the board of governors of the Colorado state university system, the total amount of which shall not exceed one million dollars, to be repaid exclusively from the user revenues accruing to the Colorado state university research building revolving fund as provided in this section and sections 23-31-111 and 23-31-112. The anticipation warrants shall not be sold at a price less than the face value thereof. Disbursements from said fund shall be only by warrant upon vouchers certified by the board of governors of the Colorado state university system.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 527, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-130 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-113 was relocated to § 23-31-104.

23-31-114. Purchase of anticipation warrants.

It is lawful for any public entity, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., to purchase anticipation warrants issued in pursuance of section 23-31-113 if such warrants satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.; but not to exceed twenty percent of the total of any specific fund of such public entity shall be invested in such warrants.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 527, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-131 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-115. Warrants as security - when.

Anticipation warrants issued in pursuance of this section and sections 23-31-111 to 23-31-114, 23-31-116, and 23-31-117 may be used as security for any depository bond or obligation where any kind of bonds or other securities must or may, by law, be deposited as security.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 527, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-132 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-115 was relocated to § 23-31-105.

23-31-116. Tax exemption.

Any anticipation warrants issued pursuant to the provisions of section 23-31-113 by the board of governors of the Colorado state university system shall be exempt from taxation for state, county, school district, special district, municipal, or any other purpose in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 528, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-133 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-117. Borrowing funds.

For the purposes described in section 23-31-112, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system is authorized to:

Enter into contracts with any person, corporation, or state or federal government agency for the advancement of money for such purposes and providing for the repayment of such advances with interest from the Colorado state university research building revolving fund; and

Issue bonds as provided in this section.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this section shall mature at such time or times, shall bear or accrue interest at such rate or rates, and shall otherwise be sold and issued in such manner and on such terms as provided by the board of governors of the Colorado state university system.

Such bonds shall be payable exclusively from, and shall be secured by a pledge of, the Colorado state university research building revolving fund created in section 23-31-112.

The authority contained in this section to issue bonds shall be in addition to the authority granted to the board of governors of the Colorado state university system to issue anticipation warrants pursuant to section 23-31-113; except that nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the issuance of bonds if by such issuance the obligation of any contract entered into with respect to any outstanding anticipation warrants would thereby be impaired.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be exempt from taxation for state, county, school district, special district, municipal, or other purposes in the state of Colorado.

Bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not constitute a debt or an indebtedness of the state within the meaning of any applicable provision of the state constitution or state statutes.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 528, § 2, effective August 3; (2)(e) amended, p. 67, § 2, effective August 3.

23-31-118. Advancement of moneys and pledge of income.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system, designated in this section as the "board", is authorized to enter into contracts for the advancement of moneys for the construction and acquisition of facilities or equipment, or both, for the Colorado state university veterinary medicine hospital, or any part thereof, and, in connection with or as a part of such contracts, to pledge revenues from a special hospital fee that the board shall collect pursuant to agreements entered into with or with respect to each accountable student as security for the repayment of the moneys advanced therefor, together with interest thereon. The maximum number of accountable students at any given time shall not exceed three hundred eight; except that, should the total enrollment in the professional veterinary medicine program exceed five hundred forty-eight head-count students, additional accountable students may not exceed forty-five percent of each admitted class. For purposes of this section, an "accountable student" is a person who, as of the date of his or her selection for admission into the professional veterinary medicine program, is not receiving funding, either from the state of Colorado or from a state that has entered into a cooperative agreement with the state of Colorado pursuant to section 24-60-601, C.R.S., for all or any portion of the costs incurred in participating in the professional veterinary medicine program. An agreement shall be entered into with or with respect to each accountable student, and each such agreement shall provide that, as a condition to that student's continued enrollment in the professional veterinary medicine program, there shall be paid annually by or on behalf of the student the special hospital fee provided for in this section, which fee shall be fixed by the board annually in an amount sufficient to meet the obligation authorized by this section.

The board shall annually assess each cooperative state or accountable student a support fee to reimburse Colorado for instructional costs. This support fee includes an equipment and renovation fee of one thousand one dollars assessed to each cooperative state or accountable student for acquisition or replacement of equipment and for renovation. Colorado shall share proportionately in the acquisition or replacement of equipment and renovation projects. The amount to be paid by Colorado shall be determined by the annual ratio of Colorado students to accountable students based upon beginning enrollment of each school year. The fee required to be collected pursuant to this subsection (2) is based on a student's status as an "accountable student" at the time of selection for admission into the professional veterinary medicine program and shall not be reduced or waived regardless of the student's status as an in-state student, pursuant to the provisions of section 23-7-103, at any time during the student's participation in the professional veterinary medicine program.

The board shall not pledge any income of the university except that authorized in subsection (1) of this section and shall not create any mortgage upon property belonging to such institution or obligate the state of Colorado for the purpose of repaying or receiving any funds raised or advanced under the provisions of this section.

Any advancement of moneys, not to exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars, may be evidenced by revenue bonds or anticipation warrants to be executed by the board for and on behalf of Colorado state university and containing such terms and provisions, including provisions for adequate reserves and for redemption prior to maturity and a maximum net effective interest rate, as may be determined by the board. Such revenue bonds or anticipation warrants shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds or anticipation warrants does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate fixed, which interest shall be payable semiannually or annually. Such revenue bonds or warrants may be sold at less than par, but they may not be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds or warrants exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate fixed. Any such revenue bonds or warrants may be refunded pursuant to article 54 of title 11, C.R.S., if in the judgment of the board such refunding is to the best interests of the university.

If the sources of pledged revenues described in subsection (1) of this section exceed the amount required for the amortization of any advancement made pursuant to this section, and the payment of interest thereof, together with reserve requirements, the board may apply such surplus to the redemption of such securities prior to maturity of such securities according to redemption provisions thereof, or such surplus may be used by the board for the purposes of maintaining, repairing, altering, or adding to any existing equipment or facilities acquired pursuant to the provisions of this section for any lawful purpose.

All obligations issued pursuant to this section and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

No action shall be brought questioning the legality of any contract, proceedings, revenue bonds, or anticipation warrants issued or to be issued by the board in connection with the provision of all or any part of the Colorado state university veterinary medicine hospital pursuant to this section after the expiration of thirty days from the effective date of any resolution or other official action authorizing such contract, adopting such proceedings, or authorizing the issuance of such warrants or bonds.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 529, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1026), ch. 12, p. 33, § 1, effective March 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-31-135 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-118 was relocated to § 23-31-107.

23-31-119. Plant breeding programs.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system is authorized to initiate and expand plant breeding programs that will result in the development of disease-resistant varieties of crop plants, particularly of small grain varieties that are resistant to black stem rust disease, and to continue or expand any plant breeding program which may be necessary to protect important crops of Colorado from diseases that would endanger or seriously reduce the production of these crops in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 530, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-110 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-119 was relocated to § 23-31-108.

23-31-120. Cooperation with other agencies.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system may cooperate with the United States department of agriculture or any of its departments or agencies, the Colorado department of agriculture, other states, counties of Colorado, any organized group of Colorado citizens, and such other agencies, firms, or individuals as may be necessary or desirable to prosecute the provisions of this part 1.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 530, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-111 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-120 was relocated to § 23-30-120.

23-31-121. Providing personnel, supplies.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system, operating through the Colorado agricultural experiment station, may provide such personnel, funds, labor, material, and supplies as are necessary for the purposes specified in sections 23-31-119 and 23-31-120.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 531, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-112 as it existed prior to 2007, and the former § 23-31-121 was relocated to § 23-31-109.

23-31-122. Agricultural extension service furnished counties.

Two or more counties may join in financing agricultural extension service furnished counties by the Colorado state university. In such event, each such county shall pay its pro rata share of the cost of such work as determined by negotiation between the board of governors of the Colorado state university system and the board of county commissioners of each such county.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 531, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-113 as it existed prior to 2007.